North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 13B. Joint Legislative Commission on Future Strategies for North Carolina. [Repealed]

§§ 120-84.6 through 120-84.12.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-266, s. 1.28(a), effective July 1, 2011 and Session Laws 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011.

History.

S. 120-84.6; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1066, s. 23; repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.28(a), effective July 1, 2011 and 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-84-7; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1066, s. 23; repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.28(a), effective July 1, 2011 and 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-84-8; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1066, s. 23; repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.28(a), effective July 1, 2011 and 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-84-9; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1066, s. 23; repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.28(a), effective July 1, 2011 and 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-84-10; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1066, s. 23; repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.28(a), effective July 1, 2011 and 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-84.11; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1066, s. 23; repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.28(a), effective July 1, 2011 and 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-84.12; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1066, s. 23; repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.28(a), effective July 1, 2011 and 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011.